Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.137

Newly incorporated city or town—Moratoria on development permits and approvals.

During the interim period, the governing body of the newly formed city or town may adopt resolutions establishing moratoria during the interim transition period on the filing of applications with the county for development permits or approvals, including, but not limited [to], subdivision approvals, short subdivision approvals, and building permits.

[ 1991 c 360 s 11.]